Massachusetts, session 194th, H3550.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1F of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(11) The department shall require gas companies and any company that provides natural
gas to households in the commonwealth to cap gas delivery fees at $0.80 per thermal unit of
measure as defined in section 111.
of 1